Utah statutes.
78B-6-1804.   Date and duration of judgment.

Upon granting a motion for the renewal of judgment, the court shall enter an order which renews the original judgment from the date of entry of the order or from the scheduled expiration date of the original order, whichever occurs first, for the same amount of time as the original judgment.



Enacted by Chapter 22, 2011 General Session

